Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,110
Detention homes; power of county boards to provide.

The several county boards of counties of Nebraska shall have the power and authority to appropriate the funds necessary to establish and maintain detention homes in connection with the juvenile courts of this state.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 67.